West Virginia, session 2026, SB134.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 20. PHYSICAL THERAPISTS. §30-20-2. Applicable law. The practices licensed under the provisions of this article and the Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training are subject to §30-1-1 et seq. of this chapter code, the provisions of this article, and any rules promulgated hereunder. §30-20-3. Definitions. As used in this article:(1) "Applicant" means any person making application for an original or renewal license or a temporary permit under the provisions of this article.(2) "Board" means the West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training.(3) "Business entity" means any firm, partnership, association, company, corporation, limited partnership, limited liability company or other entity providing physical therapy services.(4) "Consultation" means a physical therapist renders an opinion or advice to another physical therapist or health care provider through telecommunications.(5) "Direct supervision" means the actual physical presence of the physical therapist in the immediate treatment area where the treatment is being rendered.(6) "General supervision" means the physical therapist must be available at least by telecommunications.(7) "License" means a physical therapist license or license to act as a physical therapist assistant issued under the provisions of this article.(8) "Licensee" means a person holding a license under the provisions of this article.(9) "On-site supervision" means the supervising physical therapist is continuously on-site and present in the building where services are provided, is immediately available to the person being supervised, and maintains continued involvement in appropriate aspects of each treatment session.(10) "Permit" or "temporary permit" means a temporary permit issued under the provisions of this article.(11) "Permittee" means any person holding a temporary permit issued pursuant to the provisions of this article.(12) "Physical therapy aide" means a person trained under the direction of a physical therapist who performs designated and routine tasks related to physical therapy services under the direction supervision of a physical therapist.(13) "Physical therapist" means a person engaging in the practice of physical therapy who holds a license or permit issued under the provisions of this article.(14) "Physical therapist assistant" means a person holding a license or permit issued under the provisions of this article who assists in the practice of physical therapy by performing patient related activities delegated to him or her by a physical therapist and performs under the supervision of a physical therapist and which patient related activities commensurate with his or her education and training, including physical therapy procedures, but not the performance of evaluative procedures or determination and modification of the patient plan of care.(15) "Practice of physical therapy" or "physiotherapy" means the care and services as described in section nine of this article.(16) "Telecommunication" means audio, video, or data communication. §30-20-4. West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training. (a) The West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy is continued as the West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training. All references in this code to "The West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy" shall be construed as references to the West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training. (b) The board shall consist of the following members:(1) Five physical therapists;(2) One physical therapist assistant; (3) One person who is a certified athletic trainer; and(4) One citizen member, who is not licensed under the provisions of this article and who does not perform any services related to the practice of the professions regulated under the provisions of this article or have a financial interest in any health care profession, for a term of three years.(c) After the initial appointment term, the term shall be for five years. Appointments to the board shall be made by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate.(d) A licensed member of the board, at the time of his or her appointment, shall have held a license in this state for a period of not less than five years immediately preceding the appointment.(e) A member of the board shall be a resident of this state during the appointment term.(f) A member may not serve more than two consecutive full terms. A member may continue to serve until a successor has been appointed and has qualified.(g) A vacancy on the board shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term of the member whose office is vacant and the appointment shall be made within 60 days of the vacancy.(h) The Governor may remove a member from the board for neglect of duty, incompetency, or official misconduct.(i) A licensed member of the board immediately and automatically forfeits membership to the board if his or her license to practice is suspended or revoked.(j) A member of the board immediately and automatically forfeits membership to the board if he or she is convicted of a felony under the laws of any jurisdiction or becomes a nonresident of this state.(k) The board shall elect annually one of its members as chairperson who serves at the will of the board.(l) In the event of a tie vote on any matter properly brought before the board, the chairperson shall cast one additional vote to break the tie.  If the chairperson is recused or absent, the longest-serving board member who is present and not recused shall cast one additional vote.(m) A member of the board is entitled to compensation and expense reimbursement in accordance with §30-1-1 et seq. of this code.(n) A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum.(o) The board shall hold at least two annual meetings. Other meetings may be held at the call of the chairperson or upon the written request of two members, at the time and place as designated in the call or request.(p) Prior to commencing his or her duties as a member of the board, a member shall take and subscribe to the oath required by section five, article four of the Constitution of this state. §30-20-7. Fees; special revenue account; administrative fines. (a) All fees and other moneys, except administrative fines, received by the board shall be deposited in a separate special revenue fund in the State Treasury designated the "West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training Fund", which is continued. The fund is used by the board for the administration of this article. Except as may be provided in §30-1-1 et seq. of this chapter code, the board retains the amount in the special revenue account from year to year. No compensation or expense incurred under this article is a charge against the General Revenue Fund.(b) Any amounts received as fines pursuant to this article shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury. §30-20-8a. West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training criminal history record checks. (a) The West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training is authorized to require state and national criminal history record checks for the purpose of issuing licenses. The West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training shall require an applicant, including physical therapists and physical therapy assistants, as a condition of eligibility for initial license to submit to a state and national criminal history record check as set forth in this section. (b) The applicant shall meet all requirements necessary to accomplish the state and national criminal history record check, including:(1) Submitting fingerprints for the purposes set forth in this subsection; and(2) Authorizing the board, the West Virginia State Police, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to use all records submitted and produced for the purpose of screening the applicant for a license.(c) The results of the state and national criminal history record check may not be released to or by a private entity except:(1) To the individual who is the subject of the criminal history record check;(2) With the written authorization of the individual who is the subject of the criminal history record check; or(3) Pursuant to a court order.(d) The criminal history record check and related records are not public records for the purposes of §29B-1-1 et seq. of this code.(e) The applicant shall ensure that the criminal history record check is completed as soon as possible after the date of the original application for registration.(f) The applicant shall pay the actual costs of the fingerprinting and criminal history record check.(g) The board may not disqualify an applicant for initial licensure because of a prior criminal conviction that has not been reversed unless that conviction is for a crime that bears a rational nexus to the occupation requiring licensure.   (h) The board may not use crimes involving moral turpitude in making licensure determinations.(i) If an applicant is disqualified for licensure because of a criminal conviction that has not been reversed, the board shall afford the applicant the opportunity to reapply for licensure after the expiration of five years from the date of conviction or date of release from the penalty that was imposed, whichever is later, if the individual has not been convicted of any other crime during that period of time: Provided, That convictions for violent or sexual offenses or offenses shall subject an individual to a longer period of disqualification, to be determined by the board.(j) An individual with a criminal record who has not previously applied for licensure, certification, or registration may petition the board at any time for a determination of whether the individual’s criminal record will disqualify the individual from obtaining a license or other authorization to practice. This petition shall include sufficient details about the individual’s criminal record to enable the board to identify the jurisdiction where the conviction occurred, the date of the conviction, and the specific nature of the conviction. The board shall inform the individual of his or her standing within 60 days of receiving the petition from the applicant. The board may charge a fee established by rule to recoup its costs for each petition.(k) The board shall propose rules or amendments to existing rules for legislative approval to comply with the provisions of this section. These rules or amendments to rules shall be proposed pursuant to the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code within the applicable time limit to be considered by the Legislature during its regular session in the year 2020. §30-20-13. Special volunteer physical therapist license, physical therapist assistant license; civil immunity for voluntary services rendered to indigents. (a) There is established a special volunteer license for physical therapists or physical therapist assistants, as the case may be, retired or retiring from active practice who wish to donate their expertise for the care and treatment of indigent and needy patients in the clinical setting of clinics organized, in whole or in part, for the delivery of health care services without charge. The special volunteer license provided by this section shall be issued by the West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training to physical therapists or physical therapist assistants licensed or otherwise eligible for licensure under this article and the legislative rules promulgated hereunder without the payment of an application fee, license fee or renewal fee, and the initial license shall be issued for the remainder of the licensing period, and renewed consistent with the boards other licensing requirements. The board shall develop application forms for the special volunteer license provided in this section which shall contain the applicant’s acknowledgment that:(1) The applicant’s practice under the special volunteer license will be exclusively devoted to providing physical therapy care to needy and indigent persons in West Virginia;(2) The applicant may not receive any payment or compensation, either direct or indirect, or have the expectation of any payment or compensation but may donate to the clinic the proceeds of any reimbursement for any physical therapy services rendered under the special volunteer license;(3) The applicant shall supply any supporting documentation that the board may reasonably require; and(4) The applicant shall continue to participate in continuing education as required by the board for special volunteer physical therapists or physical therapist assistants license, as the case may be.(b) Any person engaged in the active practice of physical therapy in this state whose license is in good standing may donate their expertise for the care and treatment of indigent and needy patients pursuant to an arrangement with a clinic organized, in whole or in part, for the delivery of health care services without charge to the patient. Services rendered pursuant to an arrangement may be performed in either the physical therapist’s office or the clinical setting.(c) Any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who renders any physical therapy service to indigent and needy patients of a clinic organized, in whole or in part, for the delivery of health care services without charge under a special volunteer license authorized under subsection (a) of this section or pursuant to an arrangement with a clinic as authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of this section without payment or compensation or the expectation or promise of payment or compensation is immune from liability for any civil action arising out of any act or omission resulting from the rendering of the physical therapy service at the clinic unless the act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the physical therapist or physical therapist assistant. In order for the immunity under this subsection to apply, there must be a written agreement between the physical therapist or physical therapist assistant and the clinic stating that the physical therapist or physical therapist assistant will provide voluntary uncompensated physical therapy services under the control of the clinic to patients of the clinic before the rendering of any services by the physical therapist or physical therapist assistant at the clinic: Provided, That any clinic entering into such written agreement is required to maintain liability coverage of not less than $1 million per occurrence.(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, a clinic organized, in whole or in part, for the delivery of health care services without charge is not relieved from imputed liability for the negligent acts of a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant rendering voluntary physical therapy services at or for the clinic under a special volunteer license authorized under this section or who renders such care and treatment pursuant to an arrangement with a clinic as authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.(e) For purposes of this section, "otherwise eligible for licensure" means the satisfaction of all the requirements for licensure for a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant, as the case may be, except the fee requirements.(f) Nothing in this section may be construed as requiring the board to issue a special volunteer license to any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant whose license is or has been subject to any disciplinary action or to any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who has surrendered a license or caused a license to lapse, expire and become invalid in lieu of having a complaint initiated or other action taken against his or her license, or who has elected to place a license in inactive status in lieu of having a complaint initiated or other action taken against his or her license or who has been denied a license.(g) Any policy or contract of liability insurance providing coverage for liability sold, issued or delivered in this state to any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant covered under the provisions of this article shall be read so as to contain a provision or endorsement whereby the company issuing such policy waives or agrees not to assert as a defense on behalf of the policy holder or any beneficiary thereof the policy, to any claim covered by the terms of the policy within the policy limits, the immunity from liability of the insured by reason of the care and treatment of needy and indigent patients by a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who holds a special volunteer license or who renders such care and treatment pursuant to an arrangement with a clinic as authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. ARTICLE 20A. ATHLETIC TRAINERS. §30-20A-2. Applicable law. The practices licensed under the provisions of this article and the Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training are subject to §30-1-1 et seq. and §30-20A-1 et seq. of this code and any rules promulgated hereunder. (a)The board has all the powers and duties set forth in this article, by rule, §30-1-1 et seq. of this code, and elsewhere in law.(b)The board shall:(1) Hold meetings, conduct hearings, and administer examinations;(2) Establish requirements for licenses and permits;(3) Establish procedures for submitting, approving, and rejecting applications for licenses and permits;(4) Determine the qualifications of any applicant for licenses and permits;(5) Prepare, conduct, administer, and grade examinations for licenses;(6) Determine the passing grade for the examinations;(7) Maintain records of the examinations the board or a third party administers, including the number of persons taking the examination and the pass and fail rate;(8) Hire, discharge, establish the job requirements, and fix the compensation of the executive secretary;(9) Maintain an office, and hire, discharge, establish the job requirements, and fix the compensation of employees, investigators, and contracted employees necessary to enforce the provisions of this article;(10) Investigate alleged violations of the provisions of this article, legislative rules, orders, and final decisions of the board;(11) Conduct disciplinary hearings of persons regulated by the board;(12) Determine disciplinary action and issue orders;(13) Institute appropriate legal action for the enforcement of the provisions of this article;(14) Maintain an accurate registry of names and addresses of all persons regulated by the board;(15) Keep accurate and complete records of its proceedings, and certify the same as may be necessary and appropriate;(16) Establish the continuing education requirements for licenses;(17) Issue, renew, combine, deny, suspend, restrict, revoke, or reinstate licenses and permits;(18) Establish a fee schedule;(19) Take all other actions necessary and proper to effectuate the purposes of this article;(20) Propose rules for legislative approval, in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement provisions of this article, including:(A) Establish standards and requirements for licenses and permits;(B) Establish procedures for examinations and re-examinations;(C) Establish requirements for third parties to prepare and administer examinations and re-examinations;(D) Establish educational and experience requirements;(E) Establish the passing grade on examinations;(F) Establish standards for approval of courses and curriculum;(G) Establish procedures for the issuance and renewal of licenses and permits;(H) Establish a fee schedule;(I) Establish continuing education requirements for licenses;(J) Establish the procedures for denying, suspending, restricting, revoking, reinstating, or limiting the practice of licensees and permittees;(K) Adopt a standard for ethics;(L) Establish requirements for inactive or revoked licenses or permits; (M) Any other rules necessary to effectuate the provisions of this article; and(N) All of the board’s rules in effect January 1, 2020, shall remain in effect until they are amended or repealed, and references to provisions of former enactments of this section are interpreted to mean provisions of this article;(21) All fees and other moneys, except administrative fines, received by the board shall be deposited in a separate special revenue fund in the State Treasury designated the West Virginia Board of Physical Therapy and Athletic Training Fund which is continued. The fund is used by the board for the administration of this article. Except as may be provided in §30-1-1 et seq. of this code, the board retains the amount in the special revenue account from year to year. No compensation or expense incurred under this article is a charge against the General Revenue Fund;(22) Any amounts received as fines pursuant to this article shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury.(c)The board may:(1) Contract with third parties to administer examinations required under the provisions of this article;(2) Sue and be sued in its official name as an agency of this state; and(3) Confer with the Attorney General or his or her assistant in connection with legal matters and questions.